District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.12

Delivery of document of gift not required; right to examine.

(a)

A document of gift need not be delivered during the donor’s lifetime to be effective.

(b)

Upon or after an individual’s death, a person in possession of a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift with respect to the individual shall allow examination and copying of the document of gift or refusal by a person authorized to make or object to the making of an anatomical gift with respect to the individual or by a person to which the gift could pass under § 7-1531.10.

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 13, 55 DCR 2532
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 13 of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (2006).